nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Catering en horeca: Taartdozen; Afruimbakken; Rekeningmapjes; Snackbakjes; Wegwerpdeksels; Wegwerpserviesgoed; Wegwerpservies; Plastic bakjes; Cateringkarretjes; Was- en droogapparatuur voor voedingsmiddelen; Hotdogrollers; IJsbakken; Warmhoudplaten voor borden en schalen; Buffetkappen; Bakjes voor afhaalmaaltijden; Kantelbraadpannen; Automaten
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Restauration: Boîtes pâtissières; Bacs à vaisselle; Présentoirs d’addition; Emballages alimentaires pour lieux de loisirs; Couvercles jetables; Services jetables; Vaisselle jetable; Paniers de restauration; Chariots de restauration; Laveuses et sécheuses industrielles alimentaires; Grils tourne-saucisses; Bacs à glace; Chauffe-plats; Vitres pare-haleine; Emballages pour vente à emporter; Poêles basculantes; Distributeurs automatiques
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Ngành thực phẩm: Hộp đựng bánh mì; Chậu đựng bát đĩa bẩn; Sổ kẹp hóa đơn; Túi/hộp đựng đồ ăn tại khu vui chơi giải trí; Nắp nhựa dùng một lần; Đồ phục vụ bàn ăn dùng một lần; Bộ đồ ăn dùng một lần; Giỏ dịch vụ ăn uống; Xe đẩy phục vụ đồ ăn; Máy rửa và làm khô thực phẩm; Máy lăn xúc xích; Thùng đá; Máy sấy bát đĩa; Tấm chắn bụi; Túi đựng thức ăn mang về; Chảo điện lớn; Máy bán hàng tự động
it: Commercio e industria > Ristorazione: Scatole da panetteria; Vaschette; Porta conto; Contenitori ristorazione in concessione; Coperchi usa e getta; Coperti monouso; Piatti e posate usa e getta; Cestini di plastica per alimenti; Carrelli per alimenti; Lavatrici ed essicatori per alimenti; Macchine per hot dog; Armadietti per il ghiaccio; Scaldapiatti; Parafiato; Contenitori cibo da asporto; Brasiere; Distributori automatici
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 餐饮服务: 烘培包装盒; 餐盒; 发票/支票/收据夹; 小吃打包用品; 一次性盖子; 一次性餐桌用品; 一次性餐具; 食品点心篮; 餐车; 食品清洗机/烘干机; 热狗机/烤肠机; 储冰箱; 盘碟加热器; 食物罩; 外卖打包用品; 可倾式煮锅; 自动售货机
sv: Företag och industri > Livsmedelsservice: Bageriaskar; Diskkorgar; Notapärmar; Behållare för livsmedelsstånd; Engångslock; Serveringsartiklar för engångsbruk; Engångsartiklar; Korgar för livsmedelsservice; Matvagnar; Tvätt- och torkutrustning för mat; Rullgrillar för varmkorv; Islårar; Tallriksvärmare; Nysskydd; Behållare för hämtmat; Industriella stekpannor; Varuautomater
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Stravovanie: Pekárske boxy; Zberné nádoby; Dosky na účtenky; Nádoby na jedlo; Jednorazové viečka; Jednorazový servírovací riad; Jednorazový riad; Košíky na jedlo; Vozíky na potraviny; Umývačky a sušičky potravín; Zariadenia na výrobu hot-dogov; Zásobníky na ľad; Ohrievače tanierov a riadu; Ochranné steny; Výsuvné kontajnery; Naklápacie panvice; Predajné automaty
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Nahrungsmittelservice: Backwarenbehälter; Spülwannen; Scheck- & Kartenetuis; Takeaway-Behälter; Einwegdeckel; Einweg-Serviergeschirr; Einweggeschirr; Lebensmittelkörbe; Servierwagen; Gemüseschleudern; Hot-Dog-Grills; Eisbehälter; Teller- & Speisenwärmer; Auslagenschutz; Einwegbehälter; Kippbare Industriepfannen; Verkaufsautomaten
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 요식업: 베이커리 상자; 잔반통; 계산서 폴더; 길거리 음식 용기; 일회용 뚜껑; 일회용 서빙용품; 일회용 식기; 음식용 바구니; 식품용 카트; 식품 세척기/건조기; 핫도그 롤러; 얼음 보관통; 식기 보온기; 스니즈 가드; 테이크아웃 용기; 틸팅 스킬릿; 자판기
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Обществено хранене: Кутии за пекарни; Кутии за мръсни съдове; Сметкодържатели; Контейнери за храна за търговски павилиони; Капаци за еднократна употреба; Еднократни прибори за сервиране; Съдове за еднократна употреба; Панери за сервиране на храна; Колички за сервиране на храна; Машини за миене и сушене на храна; Скари за печене на кренвирши за хот-дог; Контейнери за лед; Нагреватели за чинии и съдове; Защитно стъкло за витрини; Кутии за храна за еднократна употреба; Професионални грилове под наклон; Вендинг автомати
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > บริการอาหาร: กล่องเบเกอรี่; กล่องเก็บภาชนะที่ใช้แล้วบนโต๊ะอาหาร; ปกเช็คบิล; ภาชนะใส่อาหารที่ใช้แล้วทิ้ง; ฝาแก้วพลาสติก; อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้รับประทานอาหารแบบใช้แล้วทิ้ง; อุปกรณ์รับประทานอาหารแบบใช้แล้วทิ้ง; ตะกร้าใส่อาหาร; รถเข็นบริการอาหาร; เครื่องล้างและเป่าแห้งสำหรับอาหาร; เครื่องอุ่นไส้กรอก; ที่ใส่น้ำแข็ง; เครื่องอุ่นจานชาม; ที่กั้นอาหาร; ภาชนะสำหรับใส่อาหารกลับบ้าน; หม้อทอด; ตู้ขายของอัตโนมัติ
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Maitinimo paslaugos: Kepyklos dėžutės; Padėklai autobusams; Čekių aplankai; Maisto indai koncesininkams; Vienkartiniai dangteliai; Vienkartiniai maisto pateikimo indai; Vienkartiniai stalo reikmenys; Maisto pateikimo krepšeliai; Maisto pateikimo vežimėliai; Maisto plovimo ir džiovinimo mašinos; Dešrainių griliai su ritinėliais; Ledo dėžės; Lėkščių ir indų šildytuvai; Permatomi skydai maistui; Indai maistui išsinešti; Pakreipiamos keptuvės; Pardavimo automatai
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Usluga prehrane: Kutije s kolačima; Tepsije; Korice za račun; Ugostiteljske prikolice; Jednokratni poklopci; Jednokratni pribor za posluživanje; Jednokratno posuđe; Košare za posluživanje hrane; Kolica za posluživanje hrane; Perilice i sušilice hrane; Hot dog rolleri; Posude za led; Grijači tanjura i posuđa; Zaštitna pregrada; Kutije za van; Nagibne tave; Automati
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Usługi gastronomiczne: Pudełka cukiernicze; Pojemniki na brudne naczynia; Okładki na rachunek; Opakowania do przekąsek; Pokrywki jednorazowe; Naczynia jednorazowe; Zastawa jednorazowa; Koszyki gastronomiczne; Wózki gastronomiczne; Płuczki i suszarki do żywności; Wózki z hot-dogami; Pojemniki na lód; Podgrzewacze do naczyń i potraw; Klosze do przykrywania potraw; Pojemniki na wynos; Rondle przechylne; Automaty sprzedające
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 餐飲服務: 烘焙點心包裝盒; 餐車收納盆; 支票簿/現金卡片本; 輕食容器; 免洗杯蓋/碗蓋; 免洗盛菜餐具; 免洗餐具; 食物籃; 餐推車; 食材清洗機/乾燥機; 熱狗機; 冰桶; 碗盤保溫設備; 防塵蓋/板; 外帶盒; 傾斜式燉炒鍋; 自動販賣機
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Serviço de gastronomia: Caixas para itens de padaria; Bacias plásticas; Porta-conta; Recipientes para servir alimentos; Tampas descartáveis; Utensílios para servir descartáveis; Utensílios descartáveis; Sacos plásticos para comidas; Carrinhos para serviço de alimentação; Máquinas para lavar e secar alimentos; Hot-dog rollers; Local para armazenar gelo; Aquecedores de pratos; Vidros protetores para bufê; Embalagem para viagem; Fritadeira industrial; Máquinas automáticas de venda
nb: Forretninger og industri > Matservice: Bakeriesker; Matbakker; Regningsskåler; Beholdere for stormathusholdning; Éngangslokk; Serveringsutstyr for éngangsbruk; Éngangsservise; Kurver for matservice; Vogner for matservice; Matvask og -tørkere; Pølseruller; Isbokser; Tallerkenvarmere; Hostebeskyttelse; Leveringsbeholdere; Vippepanner; Salgsautomater
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Общественное питание: Коробки для выпечки; Лотки для грязной посуды; Папки для счетов; Контейнеры для еды для торговых киосков; Одноразовые крышки; Одноразовые предметы для подачи; Одноразовая посуда; Корзины для продуктов; Сервировочные тележки; Машины для мойки и сушки продуктов; Роликовые грили для хот-догов; Бункеры для льда; Подогреватели посуды и оборудование для подогрева готовых блюд; Защитные буфетные экраны; Контейнеры для еды на вынос; Опрокидывающиеся сковороды; Торговые автоматы
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Prehranske storitve: Škatle za pecivo; Posode za shranjevanje hrane; Mape za vračanje denarja; Posode za prigrizke; Pokrovi za enkratno uporabo; Posoda za enkratno uporabo; Namizni pribor za enkratno uporabo; Košare za strežbo hrane; Vozički za strežbo hrane; Čistilci in sušilniki živil; Aparat za hrenovke; Zabojniki za led; Grelniki krožnikov in posode; Zaščitne pregrade; Posode za prenos živil; Prekucne žar ponve; Prodajni avtomati
en: Business & Industrial > Food Service: Bakery Boxes; Bus Tubs; Check Presenters; Concession Food Containers; Disposable Lids; Disposable Serveware; Disposable Tableware; Food Service Baskets; Food Service Carts; Food Washers & Dryers; Hot Dog Rollers; Ice Bins; Plate & Dish Warmers; Sneeze Guards; Take-Out Containers; Tilt Skillets; Vending Machines
es: Economía e industria > Restauración: Cajas para pasteles; Barreños; Portacuentas; Recipientes para comida rápida; Tapas desechables; Material de servir desechable; Vajilla desechable; Cestas para servir comida; Carritos de comida; Lavadoras y secadoras de alimentos; Máquinas de perritos calientes; Depósitos de hielo; Calentadores de platos; Pantalla protectora para barra; Recipientes de comida para llevar; Planchas inclinables; Máquinas expendedoras
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 飲食業: ベーカリーボックス; 食器用コンテナ; 伝票ホルダー; ファストフード・スナック用容器; 使い捨て容器用フタ; 大皿・取り分け用使い捨て食器; 使い捨て食器・カトラリー; サービングバスケット; 配膳ワゴン; 食品洗浄機・乾燥機; ホットドッグローラーグリル; アイスストッカー; ディッシュウォーマー; スニーズガード; テイクアウト容器; ティルティングパン; 自動販売機
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Υπηρεσία φαγητού: Κουτιά αρτοποιίας; Λεκάνες καθαρίσματος τραπεζιών; Θήκες παρουσίασης λογαριασμού; Συσκευασίες φαγητού για κυλικεία/αναψυκτήρια; Καπάκια μιας χρήσης; Είδη σερβιρίσματος μιας χρήσης; Επιτραπέζια σκεύη μιας χρήσης; Καλάθια υπηρεσιών φαγητού; Καροτσάκια υπηρεσιών φαγητού; Πλυντήρια & στεγνωτήρια τροφίμων; Ψηστιέρες για χοτ ντογκ; Κάδοι πάγου; Θερμαντήρες πιάτων και σκευών; Προστατευτικά υγιεινής για φτέρνισμα/βήχα; Συσκευασίες φαγητού για εκτός καταστήματος; Ανακλινόμενα τηγάνια; Αυτόματοι πωλητές
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Ételkiszolgálás: Pékségdobozok; Mosogatóedények; Számlabemutatók; Koncessziós élelmiszertartók; Eldobható fedők; Eldobható kiszolgálóeszközök; Eldobható étkészlet; Ételkiszolgáló kosarak; Ételkiszolgáló kocsik; Élelmiszermosók és -szárítók; Hot-dog-görgők; Jégtartók; Tányér- és edénymelegítők; Tüsszentésvédők; Elvihető konténerek; Fordítható tepsik; Automaták
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Yemek Servisi: Unlu Mamul Kutuları; Bulaşık Leğenleri; Hesap Sümenleri; Aperatif Yiyecek Kapları; Tek Kullanımlık Kapaklar; Tek Kullanımlık Servis Malzemeleri; Tek Kullanımlık Sofra Takımları; Yemek Servis Sepetleri; Yemek Servis Arabaları; Yiyecek Yıkama ve Kurutma Makineleri; Hot Dog Makineleri; Buz Kutuları; Tabak Isıtma Arabaları; Gıda Hijyeni Maskeleri; Paket Servis Kapları; Eğimli Tavalar; Satış Otomatları
da: Erhverv og industri > Catering: Bageriemballage; Gastronormkantine; Regningsmappe; Madbeholdere til bod; Engangslåg; Engangsserveringsbeholdere; Engangsservice; Fletkurv til servering; Serveringsvogn; Udstyr til skylning og tørring af fødevarer; Pølseruller; Isbeholdere; Tallerkenvarmere; Glasafskærmninger; Takeawaybeholdere; Stegepande med vippefunktion; Salgsautomater
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Servicii alimentare: Cutii pentru produse de panificație; Recipiente pentru debarasare; Portofele pentru nota de plată; Recipiente pentru chioșcurile cu alimente; Capace de unică folosință; Veselă de unică folosință; Tacâmuri și veselă de unică folosință; Coșuri pentru sectorul alimentar; Cărucioare pentru alimente; Mașini de spălat și uscat produse alimentare; Aparate hot dog; Cutii cu gheață; Încălzitoare pentru farfurii și vase; Plăci de protecție alimente; Containere pentru comenzi de mâncare; Tigăi basculante; Distribuitoare automate
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Cateringové služby: Krabice na pečivo; Kontejnery na špinavé nádobí; Desky na účtenky pro restaurace; Jednorázové obaly na potraviny; Jednorázová víčka; Jednorázové nádobí; Ubrusy na jedno použití; Jídelní košíky; Jídelní vozíky; Myčky a sušičky potravin; Opékače párků s rolnami; Nádoby na led; Ohřívače nádobí; Kryt na ochranu pokrmů; Nádoby na přenášení jídla; Naklápěcí pánve; Prodejní automaty
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Ruokapalvelu: Leivoslaatikot; Tiskivadit; Laskupidikkeet; Elintarvikekontit; Kertakäyttökannet; Kertakäyttöiset tarjoiluastiat; Kertakäyttöastiat; Ruuan tarjoilukorit; Ruuan tarjoilukärryt; Ruuan pesu- ja kuivauslaitteet; Hot dog -kone; Jääastiat; Lautas- ja astialämmittimet; Pisarasuojat; Take away -pakkaukset; Kippipannut; Välipala-automaatit
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Serviço alimentar: Caixas de confeitaria; Tabuleiros de restauração; Apresentadores de cheque; Recipientes de alimentos de concessão; Tampas descartáveis; Louça de servir descartável; Louça de mesa descartável; Cestos de serviço alimentar; Carrinhos de serviço alimentar; Máquinas de lavar e secar alimentos; Máquinas para grelhar salsichas; Caixas de gelo; Aquecedores de pratos e travessas; Barreiras protetoras; Recipientes alimentares; Frigideiras basculantes; Máquinas de vending